Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB91.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.11-020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Other than KRS 304.11-050, the provisions of KRS 304.11-020 to 304.11-050,
shall not apply to any insurance company or underwriter issuing contracts of
insurance to industrial insureds, government entity insureds, and exempt
commercial policyholders, nor to any contract of insurance issued to any one (1) or
more industrial insureds.
(2) For the purpose of this section:
(a) An "industrial insured" is:
1. An insured who procures the insurance of any risk or risks other than
life and annuity contracts by use of the services of a full-time employee
acting as an insurance manager or buyer or the services of a regularly
and continuously retained qualified insurance consultant; and
2. An insured whose aggregate annual premiums for insurance on all risks
total at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000); and
3. An insured having at least twenty-five (25) full-time employees; and
4. All entities that have qualified as industrial insureds as of July 1, 1999;
(b) A "government entity insured" is an insured:
1. That is a government entity, municipal corporation, or public agency
located in a city or county having a population of less than fifty
thousand (50,000); and
2. That procures the insurance of any risk or risks, other than life and
annuity contracts, by use of the services of a full-time employee acting
as an insurance manager or buyer, or by the use of the services of a
regularly and continuously retained qualified insurance consultant; and
3. Whose aggregate annual premiums for insurance on all risks total at
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), exclusive of life, health,
medical, or annuity premiums; and
4. That has at least fifty (50) full-time employees; and
5. That satisfies the criteria the commissioner promulgates by
administrative regulation;[ and]
(c) 1. An "exempt commercial policyholder" means an insured that employs
the services of an insurance agent or broker, procures commercial
insurance with the services of a full-time risk manager, or a licensed
insurance consultant, pursuant to Subtitle 9 of this chapter and:
a. Is a city, county, or urban-county with a population of at least fifty
thousand (50,000) persons, or the Commonwealth, or a not-for-
profit organization or a public entity with an annual budget of at
least twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or assets of at least
twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in the preceding fiscal
year; or
b. Certifies that it meets all four (4) of the following criteria:
i. Possesses a net worth of more than twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000) at the time the policy of insurance is issued;
ii. Generated net revenue or sales of more than fifty million
dollars ($50,000,000) in the preceding fiscal year;
iii. Employs more than one hundred (100) employees per
individual company or two hundred (200) employees per holding
company aggregate at the time the policy of insurance is issued;
and
iv. Paid annual aggregate insurance premiums of more than five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the preceding fiscal year.
2. As used in this subsection, "risk manager" means a person qualified to
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
assess an exempt commercial policyholder's insurance needs and
analyze and negotiate a policy of insurance on behalf of an exempt
commercial policyholder. A risk manager shall be:
a. A full-time employee of an exempt commercial policyholder who
holds a professional designation relevant to the type of insurance
to be purchased by the exempt commercial policyholder; or
b. A person retained by an exempt commercial policyholder who
holds a professional designation relevant to the type of insurance
to be purchased by the exempt commercial policyholder; and
(d) "Territory of the United States" includes America Samoa, Puerto Rico,
Guam, the Northern Mariana Islands, and the United States Virgin Islands.
(3) (a) Policies issued to industrial insureds, government entity insureds, and exempt
commercial policyholders are exempt from the rate and policy form
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Policies issued to industrial insureds, government entity insureds, and exempt
commercial policyholders shall contain a disclaimer in language similar to the
following: "The rate provided for in this policy is exempt from the filing and
approval requirements of Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 304. The forms which
make up this policy contract are exempt from the filing and approval
requirements of Subtitle 14 of KRS Chapter 304."
(c) The exemption of commercial policyholders under this section shall not apply
to Subtitle 39 of this chapter, KRS Chapter 342, sections in Subtitle 13 of this
chapter that pertain to workers' compensation insurance, and KRS 304.12-
230.
(4) All industrial insureds, government entity insureds, and exempt commercial
policyholders shall reapply to the commissioner for their respective insured status
every three (3) years, on a form the commissioner shall promulgate by
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
administrative regulation.
(5) KRS 304.11-020 to 304.11-050, inclusive, shall not apply to:
(a) Any life insurance company organized and operated, without profit to any
private shareholder or individual, exclusively for the purpose of aiding
educational or scientific institutions organized and operated without profit to
any private shareholder or individual by issuing insurance and annuity
contracts directly from the home office of the company and without agents or
representatives in this state only to or for the benefit of such institutions and to
individuals engaged in the services of such institutions, nor to any policy or
contract which it issues. The[; but this] exemption authorized in this
paragraph shall be conditioned upon any such company complying with the
following requirements:
1.[(a)] Payment of an annual registration fee;
2.[(b)] Filing a copy of any policy or contract issued to Kentucky
residents with the commissioner;
3.[(c)] Filing a copy of its annual statement prepared pursuant to the laws
of its state of domicile, as well as such other financial material as may
be requested, with the commissioner; and
4.[(d)] Providing, in such form as may be acceptable for the appointment
of the Secretary of State as its true and lawful attorney upon whom may
be served all lawful process in any action or proceeding against such
company arising out of any policy or contract it has issued to, or which
is currently held by, a Kentucky citizen and process so served against
such company shall have the same force and validity as if served upon
the company; or
(b) 1. Any foreign insurer that issues or delivers an individual or group
health insurance policy, certificate, plan, or contract in this state. The
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
exemption authorized in this paragraph shall be conditioned upon the
foreign insurer complying with the following requirements:
a. Securing regulatory approval from the relevant regulatory
authority of any territory of the United States to issue or deliver
the individual or group health insurance policy, certificate, plan,
or contract;
b. Submitting to the department all documentation, which may
include:
i. Financial statements and solvency documents;
ii. Forms, including applications for coverage, contracts, and
riders;
iii. Rates, including actuarial certifications; and
iv. Documentation of provider networks;
that the insurer's territorial regulatory authority requires;
c. Incorporating into the terms of the individual or group health
insurance policy, certificate, plan, or contract:
i. All requirements and consumer protections that the
insurer's relevant territorial regulatory authority requires
for the policy, certificate, plan, or contract; and
ii. The insurer's consent to have courts in this state enforce
all requirements and consumer protections required by the
insurer's relevant territorial regulatory authority for the
policy, certificate, plan, or contract; and
d. Displaying prominently on all marketing materials, applications,
and contracts that the laws of the relevant territory of the United
States, and not the laws of this state, govern the policy,
certificate, plan, or contract.
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
2. A person in this state who is affected by a foreign insurer's failure to
comply with a requirement or consumer protection imposed by the
insurer's relevant territorial regulatory authority for a policy,
certificate, plan, or contract issued or delivered under this paragraph
may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state to
obtain an order requiring compliance with the requirement or
consumer protection.
(6) For any policy, certificate, plan, or contract issued in compliance with subsection
(5)(b) of this section, a foreign insurer shall be exempt from:
(a) All other requirements of this chapter, including but not limited to:
1. Rate, policy form, and reporting requirements; and
2. Taxes, assessments, surcharges, fees, and other charges; and
(b) Any other insurance-specific taxes, assessments, surcharges, fees, and other
charges imposed or allowed by this state, or imposed by a local government
of this state, including but not limited to in Section 2 of this Act and KRS
Chapter 136.
Section 2. KRS 91A.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of each local government which elects to impose and collect
license fees or taxes upon insurance companies for the privilege of engaging in the
business of insurance may, except as provided in subsection (10) of this section,
enact or change its license fee or rate of tax to be effective July 1 of each year on a
prospective basis only and shall file with the commissioner of insurance at least one
hundred (100) days prior to the effective date, a copy of all ordinances and
amendments which impose a license fee or tax. No less than eighty-five (85) days
prior to the effective date, the commissioner of insurance shall promptly notify each
insurance company engaged in the business of insurance in the Commonwealth of
those local governments which have elected to impose the license fees or taxes and
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
the current amount of the license fee or rate of tax.
(2) Any license fee or tax imposed by a local government upon an insurance company
with respect to life insurance policies may be based upon the first year's premiums,
and, if so based, shall be applied to the amount of the premiums actually collected
within each calendar quarter upon the lives of persons residing within the corporate
limits of the local government.
(3) Any license fee or tax imposed by a local government upon any insurance company
with respect to any policy which is not a life insurance policy shall be based upon
the premiums actually collected by the insurance company within each calendar
quarter on risks located within the corporate limits of the local government on those
classes of business which the insurance company is authorized to transact, less all
premiums returned to policyholders. In determining the amount of license fee or tax
to be collected and to be paid to the local government, the insurance company shall
use the tax rate effective on the first day of the policy term. When an insurance
company collects a premium as a result of a change in the policy during the policy
term, the tax rate used shall be the rate in effect on the effective date of the policy
change. With respect to premiums returned to policyholders, the license fee or tax
shall be returned by the insurance company to the policyholder pro rata on the
unexpired amount of the premium at the same rate at which it was collected and
shall be taken as a credit by the insurance company on its next quarterly report to
the local government.
(4) The Department of Insurance shall, by administrative regulation, provide for a
reasonable collection fee to be retained by the insurance company or its agent as
compensation for collecting the tax, except that the collection fee shall not be more
than fifteen percent (15%) of the fee or tax collected and remitted to the local
government or two percent (2%) of the premiums subject to the tax, whichever is
less. To facilitate computation, collection, and remittance of the fee or tax and
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
collection fee provided in this section, the fees or taxes set out in subsection (1), (2),
or (3) of this section, together with the collection fee in this section, may be
rounded off to the nearest dollar amount.
(5) Pursuant to KRS 304.3-270, if any other state retaliates against any Kentucky
domiciliary insurer because of the requirements of this section, the commissioner of
insurance shall impose an equal tax upon the premiums written in this state by
insurers domiciled in the other state.
(6) Accounting and reporting procedures for collection and reporting of the fees or
taxes and the collection fee herein provided shall be determined by administrative
regulations promulgated by the Department of Insurance.
(7) (a) Upon written request of the legislative body of any local government, at the
expense of the requesting local government, which shall be paid in advance
by the local government to the Department of Insurance, the Department of
Insurance shall audit, or cause to be audited by contract with qualified
auditors, the books or records of the insurance companies or agents subject to
the fee or tax to determine whether the fee or tax is being properly collected
and remitted, and the findings of the audit shall be reported to the local
government and the insurance company subject to the audit. An insurance
company may appeal the findings of the audit conducted under this subsection
and any assessment issued pursuant to the audit findings in accordance with
the provisions of KRS 91A.0804(5).
(b) Willful failure to properly collect and remit the fee or tax imposed by a local
government pursuant to the authority granted by this section shall constitute
grounds for the revocation of the license issued to an insurance company or
agent under the provisions of KRS Chapter 304.
(c) If the Department of Insurance finds that an insurance company has willfully
engaged in a pattern of business conduct that fails to properly collect and
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
remit the fee or tax imposed by a local government pursuant to the authority
granted by this section, the Department of Insurance may assess the
responsible insurance company an appropriate penalty fee no greater than ten
percent (10%) of the additional license fees or taxes determined to be owed to
the local government. The penalty fee shall be paid to the local government
owed the license fee or tax less any administrative costs of the Department of
Insurance in enforcing this section. Any insurance company or agent held
responsible for a penalty fee may request a hearing with the Department of
Insurance to be conducted pursuant to KRS 304.2-310 to 304.2-370 regarding
the finding of a willful violation and the subsequent penalty fee.
(8) The license fees or taxes provided for by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall
be due thirty (30) days after the end of each calendar quarter. Annually, by March
31, each insurance company shall furnish each local government to which the tax or
fee is remitted with a breakdown of all collections in the preceding calendar year
for the following categories of insurance:
(a) Casualty;
(b) Automobile;
(c) Inland marine;
(d) Fire and allied perils;
(e) Health; and
(f) Life.
(9) Any license fee or tax not paid on or before the due date shall bear interest at the tax
interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010(6) from the date due until paid. Such
interest payable to the local government is separate of penalties provided for in
subsection (7) of this section. In addition, the local government may assess a ten
percent (10%) penalty for a tax or fee not paid within thirty (30) days after the due
date.
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
(10) No license fee or tax imposed under this section shall apply to premiums:
(a) Received on policies of group health insurance provided for state employees
under KRS 18A.225;
(b) Received on policies insuring employers against liability for personal injuries
to their employees or the death of their employees caused thereby, under the
provisions of KRS Chapter 342;
(c) Received on health insurance policies issued to individuals;
(d) Received on policies issued through Kentucky Access created in Subtitle 17B
of KRS Chapter 304;
(e) Received on policies for high deductible health plans as defined in 26 U.S.C.
sec. 223(c)(2);
(f) Received on multistate surplus lines, defined as non-admitted insurance as
provided in Title V, Subtitle B, the Non-Admitted and Reinsurance Reform
Act of 2010, of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection
Act, Pub. L. No. 111-203;
(g) Received on policies, certificates, plans, or contracts exempted under
subsection (6) of Section 1 of this Act;
(h) Paid to insurance companies or surplus lines brokers by nonprofit self-
insurance groups or self-insurance entities whose membership consists of
school districts; or
(i)[(h)] Paid to insurance companies or surplus lines brokers by nonprofit self-
insurance groups or self-insurance entities whose membership consists of
cities, counties, charter county governments, urban-county governments,
consolidated local governments, unified local governments, school districts,
or any other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.
(11) No county may impose the tax authorized by this section upon the premiums
received on policies issued to public service companies which pay ad valorem
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1291
taxes.
(12) Insurance companies which pay license fees or taxes pursuant to this section shall
credit city license fees or taxes against the same license fees or taxes levied by the
county, when the license fees or taxes are levied by the county on or after July 13,
1990. For purposes of this subsection, a consolidated local government, urban-
county government, charter county government, or unified local government shall
be considered a county.
(13) No license fee or tax imposed under this section shall apply to premiums paid to
insurers of municipal bonds, leases, or other debt instruments issued by or on behalf
of a city, county, charter county government, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, special district, nonprofit corporation, or other
political subdivision of the Commonwealth. However, this exemption shall not
apply if the bonds, leases, or other debt instruments are issued for profit or on
behalf of for-profit or private organizations.
(14) A county may impose a license fee or tax covering the entire county or may limit
the application of the fee or tax to the unincorporated portions of the county.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 136 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A foreign insurer shall be exempt from any tax, assessment, surcharge, fee, or other
charge set forth in this chapter that is imposed upon or measured by the premiums paid
to or received by the insurer for any policy, certificate, plan, or contract exempted
under subsection (6) of Section 1 of this Act.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:05 PM Jacketed